apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="dach/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
    <pardef n="samoch/ód__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ód</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odu</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odem</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ód</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odem</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odzie</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odzie</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ody</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odów</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odom</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ody</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odami</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odach</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ody</l>
          <r>ód<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
      <pardef n="ani/oł__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oł</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oła</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołowi</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oła</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołem</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ele</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ele</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eli</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ołowie</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołów</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołom</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołami</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ołach</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eli</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ołowie</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oły</l>
          <r>oł<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="dach"><i>dach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="almanach"><i>almanach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezdech"><i>bezdech</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezruch"><i>bezruch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blich"><i>blich</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cech"><i>cech</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chich"><i>chich</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chuch"><i>chuch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dach"><i>dach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drelich"><i>drelich</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyptych"><i>dyptych</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fach"><i>fach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gmach"><i>gmach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="groch"><i>groch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grzech"><i>grzech</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kopersztych"><i>kopersztych</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krach"><i>krach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loch"><i>loch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motłoch"><i>motłoch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadmuch"><i>nadmuch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nasłuch"><i>nasłuch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obciach"><i>obciach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oddech"><i>oddech</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odruch"><i>odruch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odwach"><i>odwach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piach"><i>piach</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podmuch"><i>podmuch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podsłuch"><i>podsłuch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pogwizd"><i>pogwizd</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="popłoch"><i>popłoch</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poroh"><i>poroh</i><par n="dach/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anioł"><i>ani</i><par n="ani/oł__n"/></e>
